Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3706
Court appointed special advocate programs; authorized; requirements.

(1) Court appointed special advocate programs may be established and shall operate pursuant to the Court Appointed Special Advocate Act.

(2) A court appointed special advocate program shall:

(a) Be an organization that screens, trains, and supervises court appointed special advocate volunteers to advocate for the best interests of children when appointed by a court as provided in section 43-3710. Each court may be served by a court appointed special advocate program. One program may serve more than one court;

(b) Hold regular case conferences with volunteers to review case progress and conduct annual performance reviews for all volunteers;

(c) Provide staff and volunteers with written program policies, practices, and procedures; and

(d) Provide the training required pursuant to section 43-3708.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 29.